District of Columbia statutes.
13-421

Definition of person.

As used in this subchapter, the term “person” includes an individual, his executor, administrator, or other personal representative, or a corporation, partnership, association, or any other legal or commercial entity, whether or not a citizen or domiciliary of the District of Columbia and whether or not organized under the laws of the District of Columbia.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 549, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 132(a)

History

1981 Ed., § 13-421.
1973 Ed., § 13-421.

Prior Codifications